Hawaii statutes.
[§449-20.5] Closing branch office. (a)
An escrow depository shall give the commissioner notice of its intent to close
any branch office at least thirty days prior to the closing. The notice shall:

(1) State the intended date of closing;

(2) Specify the reasons for the closing; and

(3) Contain a certification by the secretary or other
authorized officer of the escrow depository that the decision to close was duly
approved by its board of directors.

(b) After closing a branch office, the escrow
depository shall promptly thereafter surrender to the commissioner the branch
office license for that location. [L 2001, c 184, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next